Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 6 Disposal of Solid Wastes and Other Refuse
8-6-220. Yard waste — Definitions.

Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, it is illegal for yard waste to be placed in a solid waste management facility solely for the purpose of disposal, except for fugitive amounts of yard waste.

A permitted solid waste landfill may collect landfill gas from the fugitive amounts of yard waste for conversion to energy.

If authorized by the Division of Environmental Quality through a permit modification process including a public notice and comment period, yard waste may be accepted by a permitted solid waste landfill that operates a landfill gas-to-energy system for the recovery and use of landfill gas as a renewable energy fuel source.

The division shall consider, at a minimum, the following before authorizing yard waste to be accepted by a solid waste landfill for disposal:

The number and types of permitted compost facilities accepting yard waste within the service areas of the solid waste landfill;

The environmental impact of the proposed change in disposing of yard waste at a solid waste landfill instead of a permitted compost facility;

The financial impact to each permitted compost facility located within the service area of the solid waste landfill;

Whether the regional solid waste management board hosting the solid waste landfill and hosting a permitted compost facility within the solid waste landfill's service area supports the request;

The amount of yard waste the solid waste landfill intends to accept and the basis for estimating the volume of yard waste to be disposed in the solid waste landfill;

The financial impact to residents and industry within the service area of the solid waste landfill;

The location of the solid waste landfill;

The location within the solid waste landfill for the placement of yard waste;

The plans to offset the effects of disposing of yard waste on the volume reduction for municipal waste disposal;

A description and timeline for the landfill gas collected from the yard waste to become a renewable energy fuel source;

The design and efficiency of the landfill gas collection system;

A list of purchase power agreements that guarantee the collection and use of the landfill gas collected from the yard waste for energy conversion; and

Other information as may be required by the division.

Landfill gas recovered through the landfill gas-to-energy system shall be utilized for the generation of electricity or used as a substitute for conventional fuels.

In addition to composting requirements for regional solid waste management districts set forth in § 8-6-719, each district shall furnish yard waste reduction or usage and/or opportunities to ensure that its residents are provided with the availability to choose, based upon need by population or area, ways and means of usage, reduction, reuse, or composting of yard waste.

Such choices of yard waste reduction or usage shall be submitted to the division for approval and shall become an integral part of the district's solid waste management plan.

As used in this section:

“Fugitive amounts of yard waste” means small quantities that escape the approved methods of usage, reduction, reuse, or composting of yard waste;

“Landfill gas-to-energy system” means the process of collecting, storing, and converting landfill gas to electricity for a direct fuel use or other use as a substitute for conventional fuels, including without limitation flaring for system testing, system maintenance, or proving capacity for an intended energy use; and

“Yard waste” means grass clippings, leaves, and shrubbery trimmings.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 751, § 4; 1993, No. 479, § 3; 1995, No. 547, § 6; 2009, No. 1220, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2609-2612.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (a), inserted (a)(1)(B) and redesignated the existing text accordingly, substituted “Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section” for “It is established by this section that” in (a)(1)(A), and inserted (a)(2); inserted (c)(2) and redesignated the subsequent subdivision accordingly; and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(2)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

8-6-221. Review of rules.

All rules adopted under this subchapter shall be reviewed by the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor or appropriate subcommittees of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 751, § 4; 1997, No. 179, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 541.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in the section heading; and deleted “and regulations” following “All rules”.

8-6-222. Standards for sites and facilities.

Regional solid waste management boards may adopt more restrictive standards for the location, design, construction, and maintenance of solid waste disposal sites and facilities than the state government or the United States Government.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1280, § 5.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1993, No. 1280, § 1, provided: “The Arkansas General Assembly makes the following findings:

“(1)

The present landfill capacity in the State of Arkansas is inadequate and is at or near the critical point;

“(2)

As of January 1, 1993, the capacity in Arkansas was about four and one-half (4½) years of landfill life for fifty-seven (57) municipal solid waste landfills;

“(3)

By the enactment of Arkansas Act 752 of 1991, the Regional Solid Waste Management Boards were established from the preceding Regional Solid Waste Boards and said Regional Solid Waste Boards were given additional powers and duties.

“(4)

The stated purpose for the enactment of Arkansas Act 752 of 1991 was to protect the public health and the state's environmental quality by establishing regional solid waste management and planning. It was found that the preexisting system of relying upon solid waste management by individual counties and municipalities had fostered conditions in which certain areas of the state were facing capacity shortages of crises proportions, while others experienced a surfeit of capacity with individual disposal facilities which could not muster the resources for environmentally responsible operations. Despite the efforts of the Regional Solid Waste Management Boards to date, those conditions remain true at this time.

“(5)

Upon enacting Arkansas Act 752 of 1991 establishing the Regional Solid Waste Management Boards and providing for their powers and duties, the Seventy-eighth Arkansas General Assembly authorized the districts to issue rules and regulations which are consistent with and in accordance with, but no more restrictive than, all applicable environmental protection performance standards adopted by state law or incorporated by reference from federal law.

“(6)

Despite the limitation that rules and regulations of the districts be consistent with and in accordance with, but no more restrictive than, the applicable state and federal law, pursuant to Arkansas Act 237 of 1971, Arkansas Code Annotated § 8-6-209 (Repl.1991), counties and municipalities retain the authority to adopt standards, by ordinance, resolution, or order, for the location, design, construction and maintenance of solid waste disposal sites and facilities, that are more restrictive than those adopted by state law and by the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission.

“(7)

This authority vested in counties and municipalities has led in large part to the disparate environmental and economic concerns set out in Arkansas Act 752 of 1991 and summarized above and could thwart and jeopardize the purposes of Arkansas Act 752 of 1991 and its efforts to protect the public health and the state's environmental quality by establishing regional solid waste management and planning.”

8-6-223. Household hazardous waste storage or processing centers — Permit required.

It is unlawful for a person to own or operate a household hazardous waste storage or processing center, as defined in § 8-6-203, without first obtaining from the Division of Environmental Quality a transfer station permit or another permit that the division deems appropriate and that meets the requirements of this section.

The division shall not issue, modify, or renew a permit for a household hazardous waste storage or processing center regulated under this section without the permit applicant's first demonstrating to the division's satisfaction the applicant's financial ability to ensure proper removal and disposal of household hazardous waste located at the household hazardous waste storage or processing center under this section.

The amount of financial assurance required under this section shall be equal to or greater than one hundred fifty percent (150%) of a third party's cost of disposal of the maximum permitted amount of household hazardous waste at a facility permitted under the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act of 1976, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq., for the treatment, storage, and disposal of hazardous waste.

A detailed disposal estimate under this section shall be prepared by an independent professional consultant.

The permittee or applicant shall demonstrate financial ability to ensure proper removal and disposal of the household hazardous waste at its household hazardous waste storage or processing center by:

Obtaining insurance that specifically covers the costs of disposal as required by this section;

Obtaining a letter of credit;

Obtaining a bond or other surety instrument;

Creating a trust fund or escrow account;

Combining any of the instruments in subdivisions (c)(1)-(4) of this section; or

Any other financial instrument approved by the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality.

A financial instrument required by this section shall:

Be posted to the benefit of the division;

Provide that the financial instrument cannot be cancelled without sixty (60) days' prior written notice addressed to the division's legal division chief as evidenced by a signed, certified mail with a return receipt request; and

Be reviewed by the division upon receipt of the cancellation notice to determine whether the division should initiate procedures to revoke or suspend the household hazardous waste storage or processing center's permit and whether the division should take possession of the funds guaranteed by the financial assurance mechanism.

Before the division may release a financial assurance mechanism, the division shall inspect the household hazardous waste storage or processing center to determine to the division's satisfaction that no household hazardous waste is located at the household hazardous waste storage or processing center.

The division is not responsible for the removal or disposal of household hazardous waste regulated under this section.

Before an application for a permit is submitted to the division, a household hazardous waste storage or processing center shall apply for a certificate of need from the regional solid waste management board that has jurisdiction over the proposed site and shall follow the procedures and rules established under § 8-6-708.

A household hazardous waste storage or processing center shall submit a permit application to the division within ninety (90) days of the approval of the certificate of need.

If a certificate of need is not approved under subsection (g) of this section or a final determination is made by the division denying the permit application, the household hazardous waste storage or processing center shall cease all collection, storage, or processing activity and properly dispose of or recycle all materials within ninety (90) days.

[Repealed.]

A household hazardous waste storage or processing center that is operating before July 27, 2011, is exempt from obtaining a certificate of need under subsection (g) of this section.

A permit under this section is not required for recyclable materials collection centers or systems that are provided by a city, county, solid waste district, or regional solid waste management district that stores household hazardous waste in quantities of less than one hundred ten gallons (110 gal.) of each household hazardous waste, not to exceed an accumulated waste amount of five thousand gallons (5,000 gal.) of liquid waste or ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.) of nonliquid waste.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1153, § 2; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2613-2616.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a) and (c)(6); substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section; and repealed (j).

Subchapter 3
— County Solid Waste Management System Aid Fund

Effective Dates.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 5, § 3: July 1, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Fifth General Assembly, meeting in Extraordinary Session, that various appropriations enacted by the General Assembly could have the effect of placing the Constitutional and Fiscal Agencies Fund in an unsound financial condition and that the mechanism provided for in this act will help to alleviate such conditions and maintain the financial integrity of the state. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1985.”

Acts 1985, No. 986, § 6: July 1, 1985.

Acts 1987, No. 551, § 4: Apr. 2, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Sixth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that previous General Assemblies have provided appropriations for the projects enumerated in this Act; that certain appropriations will expire before the adjournment of the Regular Session; and that if such appropriations expire, the programs authorized by such appropriations would cease, thereby depriving the citizens of the State of the benefits to be derived from such projects. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-6-301. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“County solid waste collection and disposal system” or “county solid waste management system” means and includes either of the following:

A county owned and operated solid waste management and disposal system funded by moneys appropriated by the quorum court;

A municipally owned and operated solid waste management and disposal system located within the county or adjoining counties operated under contract with the county whereby the county is provided access thereto, and the quorum court appropriates funds to defray the county's share of the cost of operating the facility;

A privately owned solid waste management and disposal system located within the county or an adjoining county in which the county has entered into a contract providing access and services of the facilities for the use and benefit of the county under the terms of which the county's share of the operating cost is funded by an appropriation made by the quorum court of the county; or

A solid waste collection and disposal system operated by two (2) or more counties or by one (1) or more counties and one (1) or more municipalities or operated by a private owner under a compact or agreement whereby each of the participating counties and municipalities has access to the facilities of the solid waste collection and disposal system and appropriates, through its governing body, funds to defray their respective shares of the cost of such facility;

“Solid waste management system” means the entire process of storage, collection, transportation, processing, treatment, and disposal of solid waste.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 986, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-564.

8-6-302. County Solid Waste Management System Aid Fund.

There is established in the State Treasury a fund to be known as the “County Solid Waste Management System Aid Fund”, to consist of such special or general revenues or other moneys that may be deposited therein as provided by the General Assembly, to be used for the purpose of providing financial assistance to counties in the manner provided in this subchapter and for the establishment, expansion, maintenance, and operation of county solid waste collection and disposal systems.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 986, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-564.

Cross References.

County Solid Waste Management System Aid Fund, § 19-5-1019.

8-6-303. Allocation of funds to counties — Distribution formula.

All of the general revenues and special revenues and other funds deposited into the County Solid Waste Management System Aid Fund during each fiscal year shall be allocated by the Treasurer of State to each of the several counties in the state. The fund shall be distributed to such counties only as provided in this subchapter, on the basis of seventy-five percent (75%) divided equally among the seventy-five (75) counties of the state and twenty-five percent (25%) on the basis of population according to the most recent federal decennial census, with each county to receive an allocation thereof in the proportion that its population bears to the total population of the state.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 986, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-565.

8-6-304. Eligibility to receive funds.

Before any county shall be eligible to receive its portion of the moneys in the County Solid Waste Management System Aid Fund during any fiscal year, the county, on or before the first day of the fiscal year, shall furnish the Treasurer of State the following information on forms to be developed by the Treasurer of State proof that:

The county operates or is in the process of establishing a solid waste management system for that county and that the solid waste management system is available to serve the residents of the county and may be available for service to various cities and towns within the counties through interlocal agreements, compacts, or authorities;

The quorum court of the county has established and approved a budget for the operation of the county solid waste management system for the fiscal year and has appropriated funds therefor in an amount sufficient to support not less than fifty percent (50%) of the costs of operating the solid waste management system. The funds appropriated therefor will be used solely for the cost of establishing, operating, and maintaining the solid waste management system, for the hiring of personnel, and for the acquisition of equipment and land required to operate the solid waste management system and disposal; and

The amount of funds allocated to the county for such year under this subchapter will be used exclusively for establishing, operating, and maintaining the solid waste management system and meeting the requirements of this subchapter, including the acquisition of land and the acquisition, maintenance, repair, and operation of equipment used in connection with the operation of the solid waste management system.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 986, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-566.

8-6-305. Failure to use funds — Misuse of funds.

If any county fails during any fiscal year to expend an amount of county funds equal to at least fifty percent (50%) of the cost of operating its solid waste management system or uses any of the state funds allocated thereof under the provisions of this subchapter for any purpose other than as intended by this subchapter, then the county shall be ineligible to receive moneys during the next following fiscal year from the County Solid Waste Management System Aid Fund, but may make reapplication for state assistance funds during the year next following thereafter, upon offering the appropriate assurances in writing that the county will meet the full requirements of the intent and purposes of this subchapter in the use of the funds.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 986, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-566.

8-6-306. Reapportionment of funds.

If any county fails to qualify for its proportionate share of the moneys in the County Solid Waste Management System Aid Fund during any fiscal year, then the moneys shall be reapportioned among the various counties which qualify to receive their proportionate share of the fund moneys during the fiscal year, in accordance with the distribution formula set forth in § 8-6-303. The Treasurer of State shall monthly distribute moneys to the eligible counties as authorized in this subchapter in the same manner as other county aid funds are distributed. The moneys shall be credited and used solely for the support and operation of the county solid waste management system.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 986, § 4; 1985, (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 5, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-567.

8-6-307. Transfer of funds — Exemption.

The moneys saved from Acts 1985, No. 994, which reduced contributions made by the state for state employees who are employed by a state agency funded, in whole or in part, with general revenues, shall be set aside and implemented by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and the Treasurer of State in the amount and in accordance with procedures set forth in this section.

Beginning the month after the month in which such reductions in retirement contributions occur, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall determine the amount of the general revenue savings, by fund or fund account, based upon the previous month's payroll deductions for retirement contributions to the Public Employees' Retirement System.

During each fiscal year, the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall cause to be transferred on his or her books and those of the Treasurer of State the amount of the monthly general revenue savings from each affected fund or fund account to the Revenue Holding Fund Account before the close of business on the last day of each month until an aggregate of five million dollars ($5,000,000) of general revenue savings during each fiscal year has been transferred to the Revenue Holding Fund Account from those sources, and monthly transfers of the general revenue savings to the Revenue Holding Fund Account shall cease for the remainder of that fiscal year.

The Treasurer of State shall, after providing for the distribution of general revenues available for distribution, transfer the total amount of such general revenue savings as certified to the Treasurer of State by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State from the Revenue Holding Fund Account to the County Solid Waste Management System Aid Fund, to be used to make monthly distributions therefrom in the manner provided by law to the respective counties of this state to be used for the support of the county solid waste management system as provided in this subchapter.

The Division of Correction is exempt from the provisions of this section.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 986, § 4; 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 5, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 13-567; Acts 1987, No. 551, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 688.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1985, No. 994, § 1, in part, reduced by two percent the employer contribution rates for the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System, State, County, Municipal and School Divisions, thereby making the contribution rate for each of these divisions 10 percent, nine percent, eight percent, and seven percent respectively.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Corrections” in (d).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1985, No. 994, codified as §§ 24-3-103 [repealed] and 24-3-201 [repealed].

Subchapter 4
— Litter Control Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 1977, No. 883, § 20: Mar. 30, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly that the present laws pertaining to litter control and junk motor vehicles are inadequate and the immediate passage of this act is necessary to remedy such situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, safety and welfare shall be in effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 2005, No. 75, § 4: Feb. 7, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that current resources are limited to enforce the Litter Control Act; that this act authorizes illegal dumps control officers to issue citations for violations of the Litter Control Act; that this act clarifies the proper disposal of solid waste from illegal dumps; and that this act is immediately necessary to provide additional resources for the control of litter and the proper disposal of solid waste. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 1067, § 4: May 1, 2020.

8-6-401. Title.

This subchapter shall be cited and known as the “Litter Control Act”.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 883, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-3901.

8-6-402. Purpose.

The purpose of this subchapter is to accomplish the control of litter, inoperative household appliances, and junk motor vehicles throughout the state by regulating their disposal. The intent of this subchapter is to add to existing litter control, removal, and enforcement efforts and not to terminate or supplant such efforts, as well as the compatible goal of improving the quality of life for all the citizens of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 883, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-3901.

8-6-403. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Abandoned” means property to which no person claims or exercises right of ownership;

“Automobile repair shop” means any business which engages in the repair or servicing of vehicles;

“Commercial littering” includes, but is not limited to, littering done by commercial businesses and manufacturing companies of every kind and description, including those businesses and persons who illegally dispose of litter or solid waste for other persons in return for money, fees, or other compensation;

“Demolisher” means any person whose business, to any extent or degree, is to convert a motor vehicle or household appliance into processed scrap or scrap metal, into saleable parts, or otherwise to wreck or dismantle vehicles or appliances;

“Disposable package or container” means all items or materials designed or intended to contain another item or product, but not designed or intended for permanent or continued use;

“Enclosed building” means a structure surrounded by walls or one (1) continuous wall and having a roof enclosing the entire structure and includes a permanent appendage to the structure;

“Household appliance” includes, but is not limited to, refrigerators, freezers, ranges, stoves, automatic dishwashers, clothes washers, clothes dryers, trash compacters, television sets, radios, hot water heaters, air conditioning units, commodes and other plumbing fixtures, and bed springs or other furniture;

“Inoperative household appliance” means a discarded household appliance which by reason of mechanical or physical defects can no longer be used for its intended purpose and which is not serving a functional purpose;

“Junk motor vehicle” means any vehicle which is inoperable, dismantled, or damaged and that is unable to start and move under its own power. Vehicles are excluded as long as they are registered and bear a current license permit;

“Litter” means all waste material which has been discarded or otherwise disposed of as prohibited in this subchapter, including, but not limited to, convenience food and beverage packages or containers, trash, garbage, all other product packages or containers, and other postconsumer solid wastes.

“Litter” does not include wastes from the primary processing of mining, logging, sawmilling, or farming, the raising of poultry, manufacturing, or wastes deposited in proper receptacles;

“Old vehicle tire” means a pneumatic tire in which compressed air is designed to support a load, but which because of wear, damage, or defect can no longer safely be used on a vehicle and which is either not serving a functional purpose or use or is not in an enclosed building, a salvage yard, or the actual possession of a demolisher;

“Public place” means any area that is used or held out for use by the public, whether owned or operated by public or private interests;

“Salvage yard” means any business that, in the course of its operation, maintains ten (10) or more vehicles to be used, wholly or in parts, to generate revenue for the operation of the business; and

“Vehicle” includes every device capable of being moved upon a public highway and in, upon, or by which any persons or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a public highway, excepting devices moved by human or animal power or used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 883, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-3902.

8-6-404. Disposition of fines collected.

All fines collected under §§ 8-6-406 — 8-6-408 shall be deposited as follows:

If a municipality or county where the offense occurs is a certified affiliate of Keep Arkansas Beautiful or Keep America Beautiful, Inc., and participates in litter-control programs conducted by these organizations, then the moneys from fines collected for offenses in that jurisdiction shall be deposited, according to accounting procedures prescribed by law, into the city general fund or the county general fund to be used for the purpose of community improvement as determined by the municipal or county governing body; or

If the municipality or county where the offense occurs is not a certified affiliate of Keep Arkansas Beautiful or Keep America Beautiful, Inc., or does not participate in litter-control programs conducted by these organizations, then the moneys from fines collected for offenses in those jurisdictions shall be remitted by the tenth day of each month to the Administration of Justice Funds Section of the Office of Administrative Services of the Department of Finance and Administration, on a form provided by the Office of Administrative Services of the Department of Finance and Administration, for deposit into the Keep Arkansas Beautiful Fund Account to be used by the Keep Arkansas Beautiful Commission, as appropriated by the General Assembly, for the purposes of encouraging litter prevention and anti-litter education and increasing awareness of litter law enforcement statewide.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 883, §§ 7, 11; 1981, No. 841, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 82-3907, 82-3911; Acts 1993, No. 727, § 1; 1995, No. 979, § 1; 2001, No. 145, § 1; 2003, No. 1765, § 3; 2005, No. 646, § 1; 2015, No. 1264, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment rewrote the section heading and the section.

8-6-405. Injunction.

In addition to all other remedies provided by this subchapter, the Division of Environmental Quality, the Attorney General, the prosecuting attorney of a county where any violation of any provision of this subchapter occurs, or any citizen, resident, or taxpayer of the county where a violation of any provision of this subchapter occurs may apply to the circuit court or the judge in vacation of the county where the alleged violation occurred for an injunction to restrain, prevent, or abate the maintenance and storage of litter, junk motor vehicles, old vehicle tires, or inoperative or discarded household appliances in violation of any provision of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 883, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-3916; Acts 1991, No. 516, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 64; 2019, No. 910, § 2617.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-6-406. Littering and commercial littering.

It is unlawful to drop, deposit, discard, or otherwise dispose of litter upon any public or private property in this state or upon or into any river, lake, pond, or other stream or body of water within this state, unless:

The property has been designated by the Division of Environmental Quality as a permitted disposal site;

The litter is placed into a receptacle intended by the owner or tenant in lawful possession of that property for the deposit of litter, if it is deposited in such a manner as to prevent the litter from being carried away or deposited by the elements upon any part of the private or public property or waters; or

The person is the owner or tenant in lawful possession of the property and the litter remains upon the property and the act does not create a public health or safety hazard, a public nuisance, or a fire hazard.

However, a property owner shall not be held responsible for the actions of his or her tenant.

A person who violates this section upon conviction is guilty of a violation and shall be fined an amount not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and is subject to community service under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section.

A person who violates this section for a second or subsequent offense within three (3) years of a prior offense upon conviction is guilty of a violation and shall be fined an amount not less than two hundred dollars ($200) and not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) and is subject to community service under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section.

In addition to any sentence provided for under this subsection, the court upon conviction shall impose the following penalty of community service:

For a first offense, not more than eight (8) hours; or

For a second or subsequent offense, not more than twenty-four (24) hours.

A person may also be required by the court as a part of his or her sentence to remove litter from alongside highways and at other appropriate locations for any prescribed period.

A person convicted of a violation of this section who fails to pay any fines assessed in accordance with the findings and orders of the court shall have his or her driver's license suspended for six (6) months by the Department of Finance and Administration upon receipt by the department of an order of denial of driving privileges from the court under this section.

A person who violates this section and who is found to have committed the violation in furtherance of or as a part of a commercial enterprise, whether or not that commercial enterprise is the disposal of wastes, upon conviction is guilty of commercial littering and is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

A person convicted of commercial littering may be required to remove litter disposed of in violation of this subchapter.

All or any portion of the fines, community service, and imprisonment penalties provided by this section may be suspended by the court if the violator agrees to remove litter from alongside highways and at other appropriate locations for a prescribed period.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 883, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-3904; Acts 1999, No. 1164, § 65; 2015, No. 1264, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 2618.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment rewrote the section heading; designated the existing language as (a); substituted “It is unlawful” for “It shall be unlawful” in (a); and added (b) through (d).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1).